Vermont, session 2025-2026, S13.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 15A V.S.A. § 3-504 is amended to read:
§ 3-504. GROUNDS FOR TERMINATING RELATIONSHIP OF PARENT
AND CHILD
(a) If a respondent answers or appears at the hearing and asserts parental
rights, the court shall proceed with the hearing expeditiously. If the court
finds, upon clear and convincing evidence, that any one of the following
grounds exists and that termination is in the best interests of the minor, the
VT LEG #379343 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.13
2025 Page 2 of 2
court shall order the termination of any parental relationship of the respondent
to the minor:
* * *
(2) In the case of a minor over six months of age at the time the petition
is filed, the respondent did not exercise parental responsibility for a period of
at least six months immediately preceding the filing of the petition. In making
a determination under this subdivision, the court shall consider all relevant
factors, which may include the respondent’s failure to:
(A) make reasonable and consistent payments, in accordance with the
respondent’s financial means, for the support of the minor, although legally
obligated to do so;
(B) regularly communicate or visit with the minor; or
(C) during any time the minor was not in the physical custody of the
other parent, manifest an ability and willingness to assume legal and physical
custody of the minor.
* * *
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #379343 v.1